District of Columbia statutes.
16-551

Defending against the attachment; trial of issues.

A garnishee or stranger to the action who may make claim to the property attached may file an answer defending against the attachment. The answer may be considered as raising an issue without any reply, and any issue of fact thereby made may be tried with a jury if any party so desires.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-553.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-551.
1973 Ed., § 16-551.